src/morphology/stems/altstem-adjectives.lexc
!LEXICON A_
!! lumme
!me       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!me:pee   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!me:pe    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!me:met   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!me:pee   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!me:pe   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!me:pe   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!me:pe   A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!me:pe   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!me:pe   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! mielle
!le       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!le:tee   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!le:te    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!le:let    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!le:tee   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!le:te    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!le:te    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!le:te    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!le:te    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!le:te    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
LEXICON A_HELLE
!! vuolle
le       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
le:tee   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
le:te    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
le:let   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
le:tee   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
le:te   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
le:te   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
le:te   A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
le:te   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
le:te   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;

!LEXICON A_
!! rakenne
!ne       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ne:tee   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!ne:te    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!ne:net   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!ne:tee   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!ne:te   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!ne:te   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!ne:te   A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!ne:te   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!ne:te   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! kiinne
!ne       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ne:tee   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!ne:te    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!ne:net    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!ne:tee   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!ne:te    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!ne:te    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!ne:te    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!ne:te    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!ne:te    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! murre
!re       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!re:tee   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!re:te    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!re:ret   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!re:tee   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!re:te   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!re:te   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!re:te   A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!re:te   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!re:te   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! kierre
!re       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!re:tee   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!re:te    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!re:ret    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!re:tee   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!re:te    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!re:te    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!re:te    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!re:te    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!re:te    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! hylje
!je       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!je:kee   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!je:ke    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!je:jet    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!je:kee   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!je:ke    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!je:ke    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!je:ke    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!je:ke    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!je:ke    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! pohje
!je       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!je:kee   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!je:ke    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!je:jet   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!je:kee   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!je:ke   A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!je:ke   A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!je:ke   A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!je:ke   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!je:ke   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! kyynel
!l       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!l:le    A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!l:le    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!l:lee   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!l       A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
!l:le    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!l       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!l:le    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!l:lee   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!l       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!l:le    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!l       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!l       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!l:le    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!l:le    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!l       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!l:le    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!l:le    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! säen
!en       A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!en:kene    A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
!en:kene    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!en:kenee   A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
!en:ken       A_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
!en:kene    A_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
!en       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
!en:kene    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!en:kenee   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!en:ken       A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
!en:kene    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
!en       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!en:ken       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!en:nene    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!en:kene    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!en:ken       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!en:kene    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!en:kene    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! taival
!val       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!val:pale    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!val:pale    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!val:palee   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!val:pal       A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!val:pale    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!val       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!val:pale    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!val:palee   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!val:pal       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!val:pale    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!val       A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!val:pal       A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!val:pale    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!val:pale    A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!val:pel       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!val:pale    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!val:pale    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!
!LEXICON A_
!! udar
!dar       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!dar:tare    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!dar:tare    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!dar:taree   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!dar:tar       A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!dar:tare    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!dar       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!dar:tare    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!dar:taree   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!dar:tar       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!dar:tare    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!dar       A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!dar:tar       A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!dar:tare    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!dar:tare    A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!dar:tar       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!dar:tare    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!dar:tare    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! penger
!ger       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ger:kere    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ger:kere    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!ger:keree   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!ger:ker       A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!ger:kere    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!ger       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!ger:kere    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!ger:keree   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!ger:ker       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!ger:kere    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!ger       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!ger:ker       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!ger:kere    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!ger:kere    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!ger:ker       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!ger:kere    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!ger:kere    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! ommel
!mel       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!mel:pele    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!mel:pele    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!mel:pelee   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!mel:pel       A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!mel:pele    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!mel       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!mel:pele    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!mel:pelee   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!mel:pel       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!mel:pele    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!mel       A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!mel:pel       A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!mel:pele    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!mel:pele    A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!mel:pel       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!mel:pele    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!mel:pele    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! kinner
!ner       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!ner:teree   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!ner:ter       A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!ner       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!ner:tere    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!ner:teree   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!ner:ter       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!ner       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!ner:ter       A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!ner:tere    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!ner:tere    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!ner:ter       A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!ner:tere    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!ner:tere    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! kannel
!nel       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!nel:tele    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!nel:tele    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!nel:telee   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!nel:tel       A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!nel:tele    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!nel       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!nel:tele    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!nel:telee   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!nel:tel       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!nel:tele    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!nel       A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!nel:tel       A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!nel:tele    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!nel:tele    A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!nel:tel       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!nel:tele    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!nel:tele    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! manner
!ner       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!ner:teree   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!ner:ter       A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!ner       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!ner:teree   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!ner:ter       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!ner       A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!ner:ter       A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!ner:ter       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!ner:tere    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!LEXICON A_
!! auer
!er       A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!er:tere    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!er:tere    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!er:teree   A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!er:ter       A_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!er:tere    A_BACK_PLURALS    ;
!er       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
!er:tere    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
!er:teree   A_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
!er:ter       A_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
!er:tere    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
!er       A_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
!er:ter       A_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
!er:tere    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!er:tere    A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!er:ter       A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
!er:tere    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
!er:tere    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;

LEXICON A_PITKÄ
!! hölkkä
!! hölkkää
!! hölkkänä
!! hölkässä
!! hölkkinä
!! hölkissä
!! hölkkien
0:tkä   A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tkä   A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:tkä   A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:tk    A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:tk    A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:tkä   A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:tkä   A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0:tk    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:tk    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:tkä   A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:tk    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:de    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:s     A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;
